cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/fi_rules
// Finnish translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded


.group a
          a          a
          aa         a:
          ai         ai
          au         au

       &) a (lla_    %a

  _austr) a (l       a:        // double the middle a in australia and its inflections. 


.group ä
          ä          &
          ää         &:
          äi         &i
          äy         &y

       &) ä (lla_    %&


.group b
          b          b
          bb         b:


.group c
          c          k
          c (i       s
          c (e       s         // Pronounce c as s. Mostly foreign words such as celcius, center, cervantes, cezanne.
          cc         k:        // Utter cc as k. This includes rebecca, accord, puccini etc.

       K) ch (r      k
          city       siti      // Pronounce foreign word city as siti. Include all inflections and compound words.
                               // eg. city, citystä, intercity.


.group d
          d          d
          dd         d:


.group e
          e          e
          ee         e:
          ei         ei
          eu         eu
          ey         ey

       &) e(lla_     %e
       &) e(llä_     %e

.group f
          f          f


.group g
          g          g
          gg         g:


.group h
          h          h


.group i
          i          i
          ii         i:
          iu         iu
          ie         ie
          iy         iy

          // iä         ii&      // Improve the i in iä words. Eg. ryhmiä (ryhmä), äitiä.
          // ia         iia      // Improve the i in ia words. Eg. mattia, lattia.

       &) i (lla_    %i


.group j
          j          j


.group k
          k          k
          kk         k:


.group l
          l          l

       @) lle (_     lle_X1    // double the initial consonant of the next word


.group m
          m          m

   _sydä) m (A       m:        // double the m in sydämelinnen 


.group n
          n          n
          ng         N:
          ng (_      N
          n (p       m
          n (_p      m
          n (k       N
          n (_k      N

       @) nne (_     nne_X1    // double the initial consonant of the next word



.group o
          o          o
          oo         o:
          oi         oi
          ou         ou

     symb) o (l      oo         // double the o in symboli. Include inflections and compound words.



.group ö
          ö          Y
          öö         Y:
          öi         Yi
          öy         Yy



.group p
          p          p
          pp         p:

    _ole) p (a       p:      // double the p in olepa, olepahan.
    _ota) p (a       p:      // double the p in otapa, otapahan.

     kam) p (anj     p:      // double the p in kampanja. Include inflections and compound words.

     sam) p (oo      p:      // double the p in sampoo. Include inflections and compound words.
    sham) p (o       p:      // double the p in shampo. Include inflections and compound words.


.group q
          q          k
          qq         k:


.group r
          r          r


.group s
          s          s
          ss         ss2      // [s2] is a continuation for [s]
       K) sh         S
       K) sch        S        // Schmitt

       @) sti (_     sti_X1    // double the initial consonant of the next word


.group t
          t          t
          tt         t:

       @) tse (_     tse_X1    // double the initial consonant of the next word


.group u
          u          u
          uu         u:
          ui         wi
          uo         uo


.group v
          v          v


.group w
          w          v


.group x
          x          ks
          xx         k:s


.group y
          y          y
          yy         y:
          yi         yi
          yö         yY


.group z
          z          ts
          zz         t:s
       K) zh         Z

       pi) zza       tsa       // Pronounce pizza as pitsa. Include inflections and compound words.


.group
          å          o
          åå         o:
          š          S
          ž          Z

          $	dollarin
      __) - (_D        mi:nus
      A_) - (_D        _
      C_) - (_D        _
